dictionaries/cy_GB.aff
SFX C   io          ïaf        io
SFX C   io          i          io
SFX C   io          ïa         io
SFX C   io          ïa'i       io
SFX C   io          ïa'u       io
SFX C   io          ïa'ch      io
SFX C   io          ïa'n       io
SFX C   io          ïa'r       io
SFX C   io          ïwn        io
SFX C   io          ïwch       io
SFX C   io          ïant       io
SFX C   io          iir        io
SFX C   io          iit        io
SFX C   io          ïet        io
SFX C   io          ïai        io
SFX C   io          ïai'i      io
SFX C   io          ïai'u      io
SFX C   io          ïai'ch     io
SFX C   io          ïai'n      io
SFX C   io          ïai'r      io
SFX C   io          ïem        io
SFX C   io          ïech       io
SFX C   io          ïent       io
SFX C   io          iid        io
SFX C   io          ïais       io
SFX C   io          ïaist      io
SFX C   io          ïodd       io
SFX C   io          ïasom      io
SFX C   io          ïasoch     io
SFX C   io          ïasant     io
SFX C   io          ïwyd       io
SFX C   io          ïaswn      io
SFX C   io          ïasit      io
SFX C   io          ïaset      io
SFX C   io          ïasai      io
SFX C   io          ïasai'i    io
SFX C   io          ïasai'u    io
SFX C   io          ïasai'ch   io
SFX C   io          ïasai'n    io
SFX C   io          ïasai'r    io
SFX C   io          ïasem      io
SFX C   io          ïasech     io
SFX C   io          ïasent     io
SFX C   io          ïasid      io
SFX C   io          ïed        io
SFX C   io          ïwyf       io
SFX C   io          ych        io
SFX C   io          io         io
SFX C   io          io'i       io
SFX C   io          io'u       io
SFX C   io          io'ch      io
SFX C   io          io'n       io
SFX C   io          io'r       io
SFX C   io          ïom        io
SFX C   io          ïoch       io
SFX C   io          ïont       io
SFX C   io          ïer        io
SFX C   io          ïes        io
SFX C   io          ïest       io
SFX C   io          ïth        io
SFX C   io          ïff        io
SFX C   io          ïon        io
SFX C   io          ïan        io
SFX C   eu          eaf        eu
SFX C   eu          ëi         eu
SFX C   eu          ëi'i       eu
SFX C   eu          ëi'u       eu
SFX C   eu          ëi'ch      eu
SFX C   eu          ëi'n       eu
SFX C   eu          ëi'r       eu
SFX C   eu          ea         eu
SFX C   eu          ëwn        eu
SFX C   eu          ëwch       eu
SFX C   eu          eant       eu
SFX C   eu          ëir        eu
SFX C   eu          ëit        eu
SFX C   eu          eet        eu
SFX C   eu          eai        eu
SFX C   eu          eem        eu
SFX C   eu          eech       eu
SFX C   eu          eent       eu
SFX C   eu          ëid        eu
SFX C   eu          eais       eu
SFX C   eu          eaist      eu
SFX C   eu          eodd       eu
SFX C   eu          easom      eu
SFX C   eu          easoch     eu
SFX C   eu          easant     eu
SFX C   eu          ëwyd       eu
SFX C   eu          easwn      eu
SFX C   eu          easit      eu
SFX C   eu          easet      eu
SFX C   eu          easai      eu
SFX C   eu          easai'i    eu
SFX C   eu          easai'u    eu
SFX C   eu          easai'ch   eu
SFX C   eu          easai'n    eu
SFX C   eu          easai'r    eu
SFX C   eu          easem      eu
SFX C   eu          easech     eu
SFX C   eu          easent     eu
SFX C   eu          easid      eu
SFX C   eu          eed        eu
SFX C   eu          ëwyf       eu
SFX C   eu          ëych       eu
SFX C   eu          eo         eu
SFX C   eu          eo'i       eu
SFX C   eu          eo'u       eu
SFX C   eu          eo'ch      eu
SFX C   eu          eo'n       eu
SFX C   eu          eo'r       eu
SFX C   eu          eom        eu
SFX C   eu          eoch       eu
SFX C   eu          eont       eu
SFX C   eu          eer        eu
SFX C   eu          es         eu
SFX C   eu          est        eu
SFX C   eu          ëith       eu
SFX C   eu          ëiff       eu
SFX C   eu          eon        eu
SFX C   eu          ean        eu
